Texas, session 892, SB21.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 370, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 370.011 to read as follows: Sec. 370.011.  REQUIRED POSTING OF LOCALIZED HEALTH AND SAFETY ALERTS ON INTERNET WEBSITE. (a)  In this section, "public health and safety alert" means a weather or emergency alert, warning, or watch issued by the National Weather Service, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, or the Texas Division of Emergency Management or a successor federal or state agency. (b)  On notification of a public health and safety alert that impacts or will likely impact a municipality or county and if the municipality or county maintains an Internet website, the municipality or county shall post on the municipality's or county's Internet website in a clear and conspicuous location a localized health and safety alert in accordance with Subsection (c). (c)  A localized health and safety alert must include: (1)  each area affected by the weather event or emergency described by the public health and safety alert that is the basis for the localized health and safety alert, including a geographic display of the severity of the threat posed by the weather event or emergency; (2)  a link to an Internet website or other message system that maintains current information on each affected area; (3)  the projected movement, if any, of the weather event or emergency; and (4)  instructions for the protection of human life, including safe zones for evacuation and other resources. SECTION 2.  Section 370.011, Local Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a public health and safety alert, as defined by that section, received by a municipality or county on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.